Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF316.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 290.0132, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 36. new text end new text begin Retirement income subtraction. new text end new text begin (a) The amount of income received from a retirement savings plan is a subtraction. new text end new text begin (b) The subtraction under this subdivision is limited to: new text end new text begin (1) $12,000 for a married taxpayer filing a joint return or a surviving spouse; or new text end new text begin (2) $6,000 for all other filers. new text end new text begin (c) The maximum subtraction under paragraph (b) is reduced by 20 percent of adjusted gross income in excess of $32,000. new text end new text begin (d) The subtraction is limited to taxpayers who do not claim any of the subtractions under subdivision 5, 21, or 34. new text end new text begin (e) For the purposes of this subdivision, "retirement savings plan" means a plan or program offered by an employer that permits contributions to be set aside for retirement on a pretax or after-tax basis. Retirement savings plan includes but is not limited to a plan described in section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code, an annuity plan or annuity contract described in section 403(a) or 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, a plan within the meaning of section 457(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, a simplified employee pension (SEP) plan, a savings incentive match plan for employees (SIMPLE) plan, an automatic enrollment payroll deduction individual retirement account, and a multiemployer pension plan described in section 414(f) of the Internal Revenue Code. new text end new text begin (f) The commissioner must annually adjust the subtraction limits in paragraph (b) and the adjusted gross income amount in paragraph (c), as provided in section 270C.22. The statutory year is taxable year 2025. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024. new text end